Hawaii statutes.
[§431:14-110.5] Disclosure of workers'
compensation premium information. (a) All policies issued to employers
for workers' compensation insurance shall disclose clearly to employers as
separate figures the portion of the premium charged for:

(1) Medical care, services, and supplies;

(2) Wage loss benefits including temporary total,
temporary partial, and permanent total disability benefits and their related
benefits;

(3) Indemnity benefits for permanent partial
disability; and

(4) Death benefits.

In addition, a disclosure statement shall
indicate to the employer the portion of the premium attributable to loss
control and administrative costs, attorney's fees of the insurer, the cost of
employer requested medical examinations, and private investigation costs.

(b) When a policy is issued to employers for
workers' compensation insurance, it shall be accompanied by a statement
disclosing the percentages of premiums expended during the previous year by the
insurer for claims paid in the categories specified in subsection (a),
including loss control and administrative costs, attorney's fees of the
insurer, the cost of employer requested medical examinations, and private
investigation costs.

(c) The information provided to employers by
insurers pursuant to this section shall be provided on an annual basis to the
director of labor and industrial relations and to the commissioner.

(d) Any insurer found in violation of this
section shall pay a fine of $5,000 per violation to the insured, plus
attorney's fees and costs to the insured for enforcing this section. [L 1995, c
234, pt of §5]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next